Maryland, session 2025, HB0074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – General Provisions
1–113.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0074*

HOUSE BILL 74
(a) (1) Unless otherwise provided, in a law, resolution, or court order,
judgment, or decree that refers to publishing a legal advertisement or legal notice, words
such as “newspaper” or “newspaper in general circulation” mean a publication that:
[(1)] (I) has at least four pages;
[(2)] (II) habitually contains news items, reports of current events,
editorial comments, advertising matter, and other miscellaneous information that is of
public interest and is found generally in an ordinary newspaper;
[(3)] (III) has been published and distributed, by sale, from an established
place of business at least once a week for 6 months or more before publication of the
advertisement or notice;
[(4)] (IV) has general circulation throughout the community where the
publication is published; and
[(5)] (V) qualifies for Periodicals rates for mailing through the United
States Postal Service.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION AND FOR
PURPOSES OF THE PUBLIC GENERAL LAWS OF THE STATE, IF A LAW, RESOLUTION,
OR COURT ORDER, JUDGMENT, OR DECREE REQUIRES A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION TO PUBLISH A LEGAL ADVERTISEMENT OR LEGAL NOTICE:
(I) ANY REQUIRED ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE SHALL BE
PUBLISHED AND DISTRIBUTED THROUGH PRINT OR AND DIGITAL FORMAT;
(II) THE TIME PERIOD REQUIRED FOR PUBLICATION STARTS
ONCE THE FIRST ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE APPEARS IN PRINT OR AND DIGITAL
FORMAT; AND
(III) IF THERE ARE NO PRINT AND DIGITAL PUBLICATIONS THAT
MEET ALL OF THE QUALIFICATIONS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE MAY BE PLACED IN ANY DIGITAL PUBLICATION
THAT CAN BE ACCESSED IN THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION AND THAT
REGULARLY CONTAINS LOCAL NEWS AND INFORMATION FOR THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION.
(3) ANY DIGITAL PUBLICATION THAT PUBLISHES A LEGAL
ADVERTISEMENT OR LEGAL NOTICE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(III) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 74 3
(I) MAINTAIN AN ARCHIVE OF ALL PUBLISHED LEGAL
ADVERTISEMENTS AND LEGAL NOTICES THAT SHALL BE AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC;
AND
(II) EMPLOY AT LEAST ONE EMPLOYEE WHOSE DUTIES INCLUDE
REPORTING, WRITING, OR EDITING LOCAL NEWS AND INFORMATION.
(b) Subject to subsection [(a)] (A)(1) of this section and for purposes of the public
general laws of the State, in Prince George’s County, “newspaper in general circulation”
includes a newspaper that:
(1) is designated by the County Council as a newspaper of record; or
(2) (i) qualifies under subsection [(a)] (A)(1) of this section with respect
to Prince George’s County; and
(ii) is published by a small business as defined in § 14–201 of the
State Finance and Procurement Article.
[(c) Subject to subsection (a) of this section and for purposes of the public general
laws of the State, in Dorchester County, if a law, resolution, or court order, judgment, or
decree requires the county to publish a legal advertisement or legal notice:
(1) any required advertisement or notice shall be published and distributed
through print and digital format;
(2) the time period required for publication starts once the first
advertisement or notice appears in print or digital format; and
(3) if there is no print and digital publication that meets all of the
qualifications under subsection (a) of this section, the advertisement or notice may be
placed in any digital publication that can be accessed in Dorchester County and that
regularly contains local news and information for Dorchester County.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.